.hunspell/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX c3 émer ème/24 émer 41
SFX c3 éner ène/24 éner 41
SFX c3 éper èpe/24 éper 41
SFX c3 équer èque/24 équer 41
SFX c3 érer ère/24 érer 41
SFX c3 éser èse/24 éser 41
SFX c3 éter ète/24 éter 41
SFX c3 étrer ètre/24 étrer 41
SFX c3 évrer èvre/24 évrer 41
SFX c3 éyer èye/24 éyer 41
SFX c3 ébrer èbres/21 ébrer 44
SFX c3 écer èces/21 écer 44
SFX c3 écher èches/21 écher 44
SFX c3 écrer ècres/21 écrer 44
SFX c3 éder èdes/21 éder 44
SFX c3 éger èges/21 éger 44
SFX c3 égler ègles/21 égler 44
SFX c3 égner ègnes/21 égner 44
SFX c3 égrer ègres/21 égrer 44
SFX c3 éguer ègues/21 éguer 44
SFX c3 éler èles/21 éler 44
SFX c3 émer èmes/21 émer 44
SFX c3 éner ènes/21 éner 44
SFX c3 éper èpes/21 éper 44
SFX c3 équer èques/21 équer 44
SFX c3 érer ères/21 érer 44
SFX c3 éser èses/21 éser 44
SFX c3 éter ètes/21 éter 44
SFX c3 étrer ètres/21 étrer 44
SFX c3 évrer èvres/21 évrer 44
SFX c3 éyer èyes/21 éyer 44
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/12 ébrer 27
SFX c3 écer èce/12 écer 27
SFX c3 écher èche/12 écher 27
SFX c3 écrer ècre/12 écrer 27
SFX c3 éder ède/12 éder 27
SFX c3 éger ège/12 éger 27
SFX c3 égler ègle/12 égler 27
SFX c3 égner ègne/12 égner 27
SFX c3 égrer ègre/12 égrer 27
SFX c3 éguer ègue/12 éguer 27
SFX c3 éler èle/12 éler 27
SFX c3 émer ème/12 émer 27
SFX c3 éner ène/12 éner 27
SFX c3 éper èpe/12 éper 27
SFX c3 équer èque/12 équer 27
SFX c3 érer ère/12 érer 27
SFX c3 éser èse/12 éser 27
SFX c3 éter ète/12 éter 27
SFX c3 étrer ètre/12 étrer 27
SFX c3 évrer èvre/12 évrer 27
SFX c3 éyer èye/12 éyer 27
SFX c3 er ions er 74
SFX c3 er iez er 73
SFX c3 ébrer èbrent/12 ébrer 28
SFX c3 écer ècent/12 écer 28
SFX c3 écher èchent/12 écher 28
SFX c3 écrer ècrent/12 écrer 28
SFX c3 éder èdent/12 éder 28
SFX c3 éger ègent/12 éger 28
SFX c3 égler èglent/12 égler 28
SFX c3 égner ègnent/12 égner 28
SFX c3 égrer ègrent/12 égrer 28
SFX c3 éguer èguent/12 éguer 28
SFX c3 éler èlent/12 éler 28
SFX c3 émer èment/12 émer 28
SFX c3 éner ènent/12 éner 28
SFX c3 éper èpent/12 éper 28
SFX c3 équer èquent/12 équer 28
SFX c3 érer èrent/12 érer 28
SFX c3 éser èsent/12 éser 28
SFX c3 éter ètent/12 éter 28
SFX c3 étrer ètrent/12 étrer 28
SFX c3 évrer èvrent/12 évrer 28
SFX c3 éyer èyent/12 éyer 28
SFX c3 er asse/24 [^cg]er 61
SFX c3 écer éçasse/24 écer 61
SFX c3 éger égeasse/24 éger 61
SFX c3 er asses/21 [^cg]er 67
SFX c3 écer éçasses/21 écer 67
SFX c3 éger égeasses/21 éger 67
SFX c3 er ât/12 [^cg]er 52
SFX c3 écer éçât/12 écer 52
SFX c3 éger égeât/12 éger 52
SFX c3 er assions [^cg]er 60
SFX c3 écer éçassions écer 60
SFX c3 éger égeassions éger 60
SFX c3 er assiez [^cg]er 59
SFX c3 écer éçassiez écer 59
SFX c3 éger égeassiez éger 59
SFX c3 er assent/12 [^cg]er 54
SFX c3 écer éçassent/12 écer 54
SFX c3 éger égeassent/12 éger 54
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/21 ébrer 36
SFX c3 écer èce/21 écer 36
SFX c3 écher èche/21 écher 36
SFX c3 écrer ècre/21 écrer 36
SFX c3 éder ède/21 éder 36
SFX c3 éger ège/21 éger 36
SFX c3 égler ègle/21 égler 36
SFX c3 égner ègne/21 égner 36
SFX c3 égrer ègre/21 égrer 36
SFX c3 éguer ègue/21 éguer 36
SFX c3 éler èle/21 éler 36
SFX c3 émer ème/21 émer 36
SFX c3 éner ène/21 éner 36
SFX c3 éper èpe/21 éper 36
SFX c3 équer èque/21 équer 36
SFX c3 érer ère/21 érer 36
SFX c3 éser èse/21 éser 36
SFX c3 éter ète/21 éter 36
SFX c3 étrer ètre/21 étrer 36
SFX c3 évrer èvre/21 évrer 36
SFX c3 éyer èye/21 éyer 36
SFX c3 er ons [^cg]er 58
SFX c3 écer éçons écer 58
SFX c3 éger égeons éger 58
SFX c3 er ez er 75
